incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="fáinn/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abairt/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="do/ras__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ras</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rais</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rais</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ras</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irse</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irse</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irse</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irse</l>
          <r>ras<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/eann__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanna</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eann</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inn</l>
          <r>eann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="airg/ead__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ead</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ead</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eada</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ead</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>ead<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ceo/l__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lta</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="spl"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ú/ll__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lla</l>
          <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fáinne"><par n="f_init"/><i>áinn</i><par n="fáinn/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oráiste"><par n="o_init"/><i>ráist</i><par n="fáinn/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="páiste"><par n="p_init"/><i>áist</i><par n="fáinn/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abairt"><par n="a_init"/><i>bairt</i><par n="abairt/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doras"><par n="d_init"/><i>o</i><par n="do/ras__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peann"><par n="p_init"/><par n="p/eann__n"/></e>
    <e lm="airgead"><par n="a_init"/><i>irg</i><par n="airg/ead__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceol"><par n="c_init"/><i>eo</i><par n="ceo/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úll"><par n="ú_init"/><par n="ú/ll__n"/></e>
